Nevada, session 83, AB516.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Director shall:
(a) Take any action necessary to ensure that local educational
agencies and the Department of Education are able to receive
reimbursement for health services covered by Medicaid when such
services are provided on the premises of a school to children who
are recipients of Medicaid.
(b) Establish a program of incentive payments that increase
the effective rates of reimbursement provided under Medicaid to a
certified community behavioral health clinic or federally-qualified
health center that enters into an agreement with a local
educational agency or the Department of Education to provide
services covered by Medicaid to children who are:
(1) Enrolled in a public school; and
(2) Recipients of Medicaid.
2. The incentives provided pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 may be provided through increased rates of
reimbursement or value-based payment models.
3. The Department shall apply to the Secretary of Health and
Human Services for any necessary waiver, amendment of the State
-
*AB516_R1*

– 3 –
Plan for Medicaid or other federal authority that authorizes the
Department to receive federal funding to carry out the provisions
of this section. The Department shall fully cooperate in good faith
with the Federal Government during the application process to
satisfy the requirements of the Federal Government for obtaining
a waiver, amendment or other federal authority pursuant to this
section.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Certified community behavioral health clinic” means a
community behavioral health clinic certified in accordance with
section 223 of the Protecting Access to Medicare Act of 2014,
Public Law No. 113-93.
(b) “Federally-qualified health center” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(l)(2)(B).
(c) “Local educational agency” has the meaning ascribed to it
in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(30)(A).
(d) “Value-based payment model” means a method of payment
for health care services that provides incentives based on the
quality of care.
Sec. 3. 1. The School Health Access Resource Center is
hereby established within the Division.
2. The School Health Access Resource Center shall assist
providers of services under Medicaid and persons and entities that
wish to provide services to recipients of Medicaid on the premises
of a school to:
(a) Evaluate the benefits and drawbacks of various methods of
participating in and billing Medicaid that are available to the
provider, person or entity, including, without limitation, different
provider types under which the provider, person or entity may be
authorized to participate in and bill Medicaid; and
(b) Meet the requirements and carry out the procedures
necessary to participate in and bill Medicaid using the methods
chosen by the provider, person or entity, as applicable.
3. The Division shall provide the necessary facilities,
equipment, staff, supplies and other usual operating expenses
necessary to enable the School Health Access Resource Center to
carry out its functions.
Sec. 4. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
-
*AB516_R1*

– 4 –
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
sections 2 and 3 of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to 432.133, inclusive,
432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to 444.430, inclusive,
and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all other provisions of
law relating to the functions of the divisions of the Department, but
is not responsible for the clinical activities of the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health or the professional line activities of the other
divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
-
*AB516_R1*

– 5 –
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy
of the Department of Health and Human Services:
(a) The sum of $600,000 to enter into contracts with such
persons or entities as are necessary to conceptualize and establish
the School Health Access Resource Center pursuant to section 3 of
this act.
(b) The sum of $224,000 for the purposes of hiring staff for and
covering the costs of operating the School Health Access Resource
Center.
(c) The sum of $5,000 to acquire such equipment as is necessary
to operate the School Health Access Resource Center.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 6. 1. On or before October 1, 2025, the Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services shall submit to the
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services a request to
amend the State Plan for Medicaid or for any other necessary federal
authority to:
(a) Increase by at least 5 percent the rates of reimbursement for
services covered by Medicaid when such services are provided:
(1) On the premises of a school; and
(2) By an employee or independent contractor of a local
educational agency, as defined in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(30)(A), or the
Department of Education;
-
*AB516_R1*

– 6 –
(b) Simplify and streamline the methodology for reimbursing
primary care and preventative services covered by Medicaid when
such care and services are provided by a school-based health center;
and
(c) Increase by at least 10 percent the rates of reimbursement
under Medicaid for services described in paragraph (b) when such
care and services are provided by a school-based health center.
2. As used in this section, “school-based health center” means
a health center located on or in school grounds, property, buildings
or any other school district facilities for the purpose of rendering
care or services to any person.
Sec. 7. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 5 and 6 of this act become effective on July 1,
2025.
3. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB516_R1*